Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 35 Military Justice
35.145.
Absent and additional members.

No member of a general or special court-martial shall be absent or excused after the court has been assembled for the trial of the accused unless excused as a result of a challenge, excused by the military judge for physical disability or other good cause, or excused by order of the convening authority for good cause.

Whenever a general court-martial, other than a general court-martial composed of a military judge only, is reduced below five (5) members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than the applicable minimum number of five (5) members. The trial may proceed with the new members present after the recorded evidence previously introduced before the members of the court has been read to the court in the presence of the military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

Whenever a special court-martial, other than a special court-martial composed of a military judge only, is reduced below three (3) members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than three (3) members. The trial shall proceed with the new members present as if no evidence has been introduced previously at the trial, unless a verbatim record of the evidence previously introduced before the members of the court or a stipulation thereof is read to the court in the presence of the military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

If the military judge of a court-martial composed of a military judge only is unable to proceed with the trial because of physical disability, as a result of a challenge, or for other good cause, the trial shall proceed, subject to any applicable conditions in KRS 35.075(1)(b) or (2)(b), after the detail of a new military judge as if no evidence had previously been introduced, unless a verbatim record of the evidence previously introduced or a stipulation thereof is read in court in the presence of the new military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 28; 1970, ch. 56, § 19; 2013, ch. 32, § 30, effective June 25, 2013.

35.150.
Charges and specifications.

Charges and specifications shall be signed by a person subject to this code under oath before a commissioned officer authorized by this chapter to administer oaths and shall state:

That the signer has personal knowledge of, or has investigated, the matters set forth therein; and

That they are true in fact to the best of the signer’s knowledge and belief.

Upon the preferring of charges, the proper authority shall take immediate steps to determine what disposition should be made thereof in the interest of justice and discipline, and the person accused shall be informed of the charges as soon as practicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 29, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 31, effective June 25, 2013.

35.155.
Compulsory self-incrimination prohibited.

No person subject to this code may compel any person to incriminate himself or herself or to answer any question the answer to which may tend to incriminate him or her.

No person subject to this code may interrogate or request any statement from an accused or a person suspected of an offense without first informing that person of the nature of the accusation and advising that person that the person does not have to make any statement regarding the offense of which the person is accused or suspected, and that any statement made by the person may be used as evidence against the person in a trial by court-martial.

No person subject to this code may compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any military court if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue and may tend to degrade the person.

No statement obtained from any person in violation of this section, or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement shall be received in evidence against the person in a trial by court-martial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 30; 1970, ch. 56, § 20; 2013, ch. 32, § 32, effective June 25, 2013.

35.160.
Investigation.

No charge or specification shall be referred to a general court-martial for trial until a thorough and impartial investigation of all the matters set forth therein has been made. This investigation shall include inquiry as to the truth of the matter set forth in the charges, consideration of the form of charges, and a recommendation as to the disposition which should be made of the case in the interest of justice and discipline.

The accused shall be advised of the charges against the accused and of the right to be represented at that investigation by counsel. The accused has the right to be represented at that investigation as provided in KRS

35.190

and in regulations prescribed under that section. At that investigation full opportunity shall be given to the accused to cross-examine witnesses against the accused if they are available and to present anything the accused may desire in the accused’s own behalf, either in defense or mitigation, and the investigating officer shall examine available witnesses requested by the accused. If the charges are forwarded after such investigation, they shall be accompanied by a statement of the substance of the testimony taken on both sides and a copy thereof shall be given to the accused.

If an investigation of the subject matter of an offense has been conducted before the accused is charged with the offense, and if the accused was present at the investigation and afforded the opportunities for representation, cross-examination, and presentation as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, no further investigation of that charge is necessary under this section unless it is demanded by the accused after the accused is informed of the charge. A demand for further investigation entitles the accused to recall witnesses for further cross-examination and to offer any new evidence in the accused’s own behalf.

If evidence adduced in an investigation under this section indicates that the accused committed an uncharged offense, the investigating officer may investigate the subject matter of that offense without the accused having first been charged with the offense if the accused is:

Present at the investigation;

Informed of the nature of each uncharged offense investigated; and

Afforded the opportunities for representation, cross-examination, and presentation prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

The requirements of this section are binding on all persons administering this code, but failure to follow them does not constitute jurisdictional error.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 31; 1970, ch. 56, § 21; 1972, ch. 154, § 1; 2013, ch. 32, § 33, effective June 25, 2013.

35.165.
Forwarding of charges.

When a person is held for trial by general court-martial, the commanding officer shall, within eight (8) days after the accused is ordered into arrest or confinement, if practicable, forward the charges, together with the investigation and allied papers, to the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction. If that is not practicable, the commanding officer shall report in writing to that person the reasons for delay.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 32, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 34, effective June 25, 2013.

35.170.
Advice of judge advocate and reference for trial.

Before directing the trial of any charge by general court-martial, the convening authority shall refer it to a judge advocate for consideration and advice. The convening authority may not refer a specification under a charge to a general court-martial for trial unless the convening authority has been advised in writing by a judge advocate that:

The specification alleges an offense under this code;

The specification is warranted by evidence indicated in the report of investigation under KRS

35.160

, if there is a report; and

A court-martial would have jurisdiction over the accused and the offense.

The advice of the judge advocate under subsection (1) of this section with respect to a specification under a charge shall include a written and signed statement by the judge advocate:

Expressing conclusions with respect to each matter set forth in subsection (1) of this section; and

Recommending action that the convening authority take regarding the specification.

If the specification is referred for trial, the recommendation of the judge advocate shall accompany the specification.

If the charges or specifications are not formally correct or do not conform to the substance of the evidence contained in the report of the investigating officer, formal corrections and such changes in the charges and specifications as are needed to make them conform to the evidence may be made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 33, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 35, effective June 25, 2013.

35.175.
Service of charges.

The trial counsel shall serve or cause to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges. No person may, against the person’s objection, be brought to trial before a general court-martial case within a period of five (5) days after the service of charges upon the person, or in a special court-martial, within a period of three (3) days after the service of the charges upon the accused.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 34; 1970, ch. 56, § 22; 2013, ch. 32, § 36, effective June 25, 2013.

35.180.
Governor or the adjutant general may prescribe rules.

Pretrial, trial, and post-trial procedures, including modes of proof, for courts-martial cases arising under this code, and for courts of inquiry, may be prescribed by the Governor or adjutant general by regulations, or as otherwise provided by law, which shall apply the principles of law and the rules of evidence generally recognized in military criminal cases in the courts of the Armed Forces but which may not be contrary to or inconsistent with this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 35, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 37, effective June 25, 2013.

35.185.
Unlawfully influencing action of court.

No authority convening a general or special court-martial, nor any other commanding officer, or officer serving on the staff thereof, may censure, reprimand, or admonish the court or any member, military judge, or counsel thereof, with respect to the findings or sentence adjudged by the court, or with respect to any other exercise of its or their functions in the conduct of the proceeding. No person subject to this code may attempt to coerce or, by unauthorized means, influence the action of a court-martial or court of inquiry or any member thereof in reaching the findings or sentence in any case, or the action of any convening, approving or reviewing authority with respect to their judicial acts. The foregoing provisions shall not apply to:

General instructional or informational courses in military justice, if such courses are designed solely for the purpose of instructing members of a command in the substantive and procedural aspects of courts-martial; or

Statements and instructions given in open court by the military judge or counsel.

In the preparation of an effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency report, or any other report or document used in whole or in part for the purpose of determining whether a member of the state military forces is qualified to be advanced in grade or in determining the assignment or transfer of a member of the state military forces or in determining whether a member of the state military forces should be retained on active status, no person subject to this code may in preparing any such report:

Consider or evaluate the performance of duty of any such member as a member of a court-martial or witness therein; or

Give a less favorable rating or evaluation of any counsel of the accused because of zealous representation before a court-martial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 36; 1970, ch. 56, § 23; 2013, ch. 32, § 38, effective June 25, 2013.

35.190.
Duties of trial counsel and defense counsel.

The trial counsel of a general or special court-martial shall be a member in good standing of the state bar and shall prosecute in the name of the state, and shall, under the direction of the court, prepare the record of the proceedings.

The accused has the right to be represented in defense before a general or special court-martial under KRS

35.160

as provided in this subsection.

The accused may be represented by civilian counsel at the provision and expense of the accused.

The accused may be represented:

By military counsel detailed under KRS

35.130

; or

By military counsel of the accused’s own selection if that counsel is reasonably available as determined under paragraph (g) of this subsection.

If the accused is represented by civilian counsel, military counsel detailed or selected under paragraph (c) of this subsection shall act as his associate counsel unless excused at the request of the accused.

Except as provided under paragraph (f) of this subsection, if the accused is represented by military counsel of his own selection under paragraph (c)2. of this subsection, any military counsel detailed under paragraph (c)1. of this subsection shall be excused.

The accused is not entitled to be represented by more than one (1) military counsel. However, the person authorized under regulations prescribed under KRS

35.130

to detail counsel, in that person’s sole discretion:

May detail additional military counsel as assistant defense counsel; and

If the accused is represented by military counsel of the accused’s own selection under paragraph (c)2. of this subsection, may approve a request from the accused that military counsel detailed under paragraph (c)1. of this subsection act as associate defense counsel.

The senior force judge advocate of the same force of which the accused is a member, shall determine whether the military counsel selected by an accused is reasonably available.

In any court-martial proceeding resulting in a conviction, the defense counsel may:

Forward for attachment to the record of proceedings a brief of such matters as counsel determines should be considered in behalf of the accused on review, including any objection to the contents of the record which counsel may deem appropriate;

Assist the accused in the submission of any matter under KRS

35.326

; and

Take other action authorized by this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 37; 1970, ch. 56, § 24; 2013, ch. 32, § 39, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2013). An internal reference has been changed in subsection (2)(c)1. of this statute. In the enacted version (2013 Ky. Acts ch. 32, sec. 39), there is a reference to “Section 23 of this Act” (KRS

35.090

). However, it is clear from examining earlier versions of this legislation drafted during the 2013 Regular Session of the General Assembly, and from a reading of Article 38 of the Uniform State Code of Military Justice, that a reference to Section 28 (KRS

35.130

) was intended. Accordingly, under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has changed the reference to read “KRS

35.130

.”

35.195.
Sessions.

At any time after the service of charges which have been referred for trial to a court-martial composed of a military judge and members, the military judge may, subject to KRS

35.175

, call the court into session without the presence of the members for the purpose of:

Hearing and determining motions raising defenses or objections which are capable of determination without trial of the issues raised by a plea of not guilty;

Hearing and ruling upon any matter which may be ruled upon by the military judge under this code whether or not the matter is appropriate for later consideration or decision by the members of the court;

Holding the arraignment and receiving the pleas of the accused; and

Performing any other procedural function which does not require the presence of the members of the court under this code. These proceedings shall be conducted in the presence of the accused, defense counsel, and trial counsel and shall be made part of the record.

These proceedings may be conducted notwithstanding the number of court members and without regard to KRS

35.145

.

When the members of a court-martial deliberate or vote, only the members may be present. All other proceedings, including any consultation of the members of the court with counsel or the military judge shall be made part of the record and shall be in the presence of the accused, the defense counsel, the trial counsel, and the military judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 38; 1970, ch. 56, § 25; 2013, ch. 32, § 40, effective June 25, 2013.

35.200.
Continuances.

The military judge of a court-martial may, for reasonable cause, grant a continuance to any party for such time and as often as appears to be just.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 39; 1970, ch. 56, § 26; 2013, ch. 32, § 41, effective June 25, 2013.

35.205.
Challenges.

The military judge and members of a general or special court-martial may be challenged by the accused or the trial counsel for cause stated to the court. The military judge or the court shall determine the relevancy and validity of challenges for cause, and may not receive a challenge to more than one (1) person at a time. Challenges by the trial counsel shall ordinarily be presented and decided before those by the accused are offered.

If the exercise of a challenge for cause reduces the court below the minimum number of members required by KRS

35.075

, all parties shall, notwithstanding KRS

35.145

, either exercise or waive any challenge for cause then apparent against the remaining members of the court before additional members are detailed by the court. However, peremptory challenges shall not be exercised at that time.

Each accused and trial counsel is entitled to one (1) peremptory challenge of members of the court. The military judge may not be challenged except for cause.

If the exercise of a peremptory challenge reduces the court below the minimum number of members required by KRS

35.075

, the parties shall, notwithstanding KRS

35.145

, either exercise or waive any remaining peremptory challenge not previously waived against the remaining members of the court before additional members are detailed to the court.

Whenever additional members are detailed to the court, and after any challenges for cause against such additional members are presented and decided, each accused and the trial counsel are entitled to one (1) peremptory challenge against members not previously subject to peremptory challenge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 40; 1970, ch. 56, § 27; 2013, ch. 32, § 42, effective June 25, 2013.

35.210.
Oaths or affirmations.

Before performing their respective duties, military judges, general and special courts-martial members, trial counsel, defense counsel, reporters and interpreters shall take an oath or affirmation in the presence of the accused to perform their duties faithfully. The form of the oath or affirmation, the time and place of the taking thereof, the manner of recording the same, and whether the oath or affirmation shall be taken for all cases in which these duties are to be performed or for a particular case, shall be as prescribed in regulation or as provided by law. These regulations may provide that an oath or affirmation to perform faithfully the duties as a military judge, trial counsel, or defense counsel may be taken at any time by any judge advocate or other person certified or designated to be qualified or competent for the duty, and if such an oath or affirmation is taken, it need not again be taken at the time the judge advocate or other person is detailed to that duty.

Each witness before a court-martial shall be examined on oath or affirmation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 41; 1970, ch. 56, § 28; 2013, ch. 32, § 43, effective June 25, 2013.

35.215.
Statute of limitations.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person charged with any offense is not liable to be tried by court-martial or punished under KRS

35.070

if the offense was committed more than three (3) years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by an officer exercising court-martial jurisdiction over the command or before the imposition of punishment under KRS

35.070

. There shall be no statute of limitations for the crimes set forth in KRS

35.678

to

35.690

.

Periods in which the accused is absent without authority or fleeing from justice shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation prescribed in this article.

Periods in which the accused was absent from territory in which the state has the authority to apprehend him, or in the custody of civil authorities, or in the hands of the enemy, shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation prescribed in this section.

When the United States is at war, the running of any statute of limitations applicable to any offense under this code:

Involving fraud or attempted fraud against the United States, any state, or any agency of either in any manner, whether by conspiracy or not;

Committed in connection with the acquisition, care, handling, custody, control, or disposition of any real or personal property of the United States or any state; or

Committed in connection with the negotiation, procurement, award, performance, payment, interim financing, cancellation, or other termination or settlement, of any contract, subcontract, or purchase order which is connected with or related to the prosecution of the war, or with any disposition of termination inventory by any war contractor or government agency;

is suspended until two (2) years after the termination of hostilities as proclaimed by the President or by a joint resolution of Congress.

“War,” as used in subsection (4) of this section, means a period of war declared by Congress or the factual determination by the President that the existence of hostilities warrants a finding that a time of war exists.

If charges or specifications are dismissed as defective or insufficient for any cause and the period prescribed by the applicable statute of limitations:

Has expired; or

Will expire within one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of dismissal of the charges and specifications;

trial and punishment under new charges and specifications are not barred by the statute of limitations if the conditions specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection are met.

The conditions referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection are that the new charges and specifications must:

Be received by a commander within one hundred eighty (180) days after the dismissal of the charges or specifications; and

Allege the acts or omissions that were alleged in the dismissed charges or specifications.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 42; 1970, ch. 56, § 29; 2013, ch. 32, § 44, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 75, § 4, effective July 15, 2016.

35.220.
Former jeopardy.

No person may, without his consent, be tried a second time for the same offense.

No proceeding in which an accused has been found guilty by a court-martial upon any charge or specification is a trial in the sense of this section until the finding of guilty has become final after review of the case has been fully completed.

A proceeding which, after the introduction of evidence but before a finding, is dismissed or terminated by the convening authority or on motion of the prosecution for failure of available evidence or witnesses without any fault of the accused shall be a trial in the sense of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 43; 1970, ch. 56, § 30; 2013, ch. 32, § 45, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Former jeopardy, Penal Code, KRS

505.020

to

505.050

.

35.225.
Pleas of the accused.

If an accused after arraignment makes any irregular pleading, or, after a plea of guilty, sets up matter inconsistent with the plea, or if it appears that the accused has entered the plea of guilty improvidently or through lack of understanding of its meaning and effect, or if the accused fails or refuses to plead, a plea of not guilty shall be entered in the record and the court shall proceed as though he had pleaded not guilty.

With respect to any charge or specification to which a plea of guilty has been made by the accused and accepted by the military judge or by a court-martial without a military judge, a finding of guilty of the charge or specification may be entered immediately without vote. This finding shall constitute the finding of the court unless the plea of guilty is withdrawn prior to the announcement of the sentence, in which event the proceedings shall continue as though the accused had pleaded not guilty.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 44; 1970, ch. 56, § 31; 2013, ch. 32, § 46, effective June 25, 2013.

35.230.
Opportunity to obtain witnesses and other evidence.

The trial counsel, defense counsel, and the court-martial shall have equal opportunity to obtain witnesses and other evidence as prescribed by regulations and provided by law. Process issued in court-martial cases to compel witnesses to appear and testify and to compel the production of other evidence shall apply the principles of law and the rules of courts-martial generally recognized in military criminal cases in the courts of the Armed Forces of the United States, but which may not be contrary to or inconsistent with this code. Process shall run to any part of the United States, or the Territories, Commonwealths, and possessions, and may be executed by civil officers as prescribed by the laws of the place where the witness or evidence is located or of the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 45; 1970, ch. 56, § 32; 2013, ch. 32, § 47, effective June 25, 2013.

35.235.
Refusal to appear or testify.

Any person not subject to this code, who:

Has been duly subpoenaed to appear as a witness or to produce books and records before a court-martial or court of inquiry, or before any military or civil officer designated to take a deposition to be read in evidence before such a court;

Has been duly paid or tendered the fees and mileage of a witness at the rates allowed to witnesses attending a criminal court of the state; and

Willfully neglects or refuses to appear, or refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify or to produce any evidence which that person may have been legally subpoenaed to produce;

may be punished by the military court in the same manner as a criminal court of the state.

The fees and mileage of witnesses shall be advanced or paid out of the appropriations for the compensation of witnesses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 46; 1970, ch. 56, § 33; 2013, ch. 32, § 48, effective June 25, 2013.

35.240.
Contempt.

A military judge may punish for contempt any person who uses any disrespectful word, sign, or gesture in its presence, or who disturbs its proceedings by any riot or disorder.

A person subject to this code may be punished for contempt by confinement not to exceed thirty (30) days or a fine of one hundred dollars ($100), or both.

Any person not subject to this code may be punished for contempt by a military court in the same manner as a criminal court of the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 47; 1970, ch. 56, § 34; 2013, ch. 32, § 49, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Power of courts-martial to punish for contempt. 8 A.L.R. 1547; 54 A.L.R. 321.

35.245.
Depositions.

At any time after charges have been signed as provided in KRS

35.150

, any party may take oral or written depositions unless the military judge hearing the case, or, if the case is not being heard, an authority competent to convene a court-martial for the trial of those charges forbids it for good cause.

The party at whose instance a deposition is to be taken shall give to every other party reasonable written notice of the time and place for taking the deposition.

Depositions may be taken before and authenticated by any military or civil officer authorized by the laws of the state or by the laws of the place where the deposition is taken to administer oaths.

A duly authenticated deposition taken upon reasonable notice to the other parties, so far as otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence, may be read in evidence or, in the case of audiotape, videotape, digital image or file, or similar material, may be placed in evidence before any military court, if it appears:

That the witness resides or is beyond the state in which the court is ordered to sit, or beyond one hundred (100) miles from the place of trial or hearing;

That the witness, by reason of death, age, sickness, bodily infirmity, imprisonment, military necessity, nonamenability to process, or other reasonable cause, is unable or refuses to appear and testify in person at the place of trial or hearing; or

That the present whereabouts of the witness is unknown.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 48; 1970, ch. 56, § 35; 2013, ch. 32, § 50, effective June 25, 2013.

35.250.
Admissibility of records of courts of inquiry.

In any case not extending to the dismissal of a commissioned officer, the sworn testimony, contained in the duly authenticated record of proceedings of a court of inquiry, of a person whose oral testimony cannot be obtained, may, if otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence, be read in evidence by any party before a court-martial if the accused was a party before the court of inquiry and if the same issue was involved or if the accused consents to the introduction of such evidence.

Such testimony may be read in evidence only by the defense in cases extending to the dismissal of a commissioned officer.

Such testimony may also be read in evidence before a court of inquiry.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 49; 1970, ch. 56, § 36; 2013, ch. 32, § 51, effective June 25, 2013.

35.252.
Defense of lack of mental responsibility.

It is an affirmative defense in a trial by court-martial that, at the time of the commission of the acts constituting the offense, the accused, as a result of severe mental disease or defect, was unable to appreciate the nature and quality or the wrongfulness of the acts. Mental disease or defect does not otherwise constitute a defense.

The accused has the burden of proving the defense of lack of mental responsibility by clear and convincing evidence.

Whenever lack of mental responsibility of the accused with respect to an offense is properly at issue, the military judge shall instruct the members of the court as to the defense of lack of mental responsibility under this section and charge them to find the accused:

Guilty;

Not guilty; or

Not guilty only by reason of lack of mental responsibility.

Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to a court-martial composed of a military judge only. In the case of a court-martial composed of a military judge only, whenever lack of mental responsibility of the accused with respect to an offense is properly at issue, the military judge shall find the accused:

Guilty;

Not guilty; or

Not guilty only by reason of lack of mental responsibility.

Notwithstanding KRS

35.260

, the accused shall be found not guilty only by reason of lack of mental responsibility if:

A majority of the members of the court-martial present at the time the vote is taken determines that the defense of lack of mental responsibility has been established; or

In the case of a court-martial composed of a military judge only, the military judge determines that the defense of lack of mental responsibility has been established.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 52, effective June 25, 2013.

35.255.
Voting and rulings.

Voting by members of a general or special court-martial on the findings and on the sentence shall be by secret written ballot. The junior member of the court shall count the votes. The count shall be checked by the president, who shall forthwith announce the result of the ballot to the members of the court.

The military judge shall rule upon all questions of law and interlocutory questions arising during the proceedings. Any such ruling made by the military judge upon any question of law or any interlocutory question other than the factual issue of mental responsibility of the accused is final and constitutes the ruling of the court. However, the military judge may change the ruling at any time during the trial. Unless the ruling is final, if any member objects thereto, the court shall be cleared and closed and the question decided by a voice vote as provided in KRS

35.260

, beginning with the junior in rank.

Before a vote is taken on the findings, the military judge shall, in the presence of the accused and counsel, instruct the members of the court as to the elements of the offense and charge them:

That the accused must be presumed to be innocent until his guilt is established by legal and competent evidence beyond reasonable doubt;

That in the case being considered, if there is a reasonable doubt as to the guilt of the accused, the doubt shall be resolved in favor of the accused and he shall be acquitted;

That if there is a reasonable doubt as to the degree of guilt, the finding must be in a lower degree as to which there is no reasonable doubt; and

That the burden of proof to establish the guilt of the accused beyond reasonable doubt is upon the state.

Subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section do not apply to a court-martial composed of a military judge only. The military judge of such a court-martial shall determine all questions of law and fact arising during the proceedings and, if the accused is convicted, adjudge an appropriate sentence. The military judge of such a court-martial shall make a general finding and shall in addition on request find the facts specially. If an opinion or memorandum decision is filed, it will be sufficient if the findings of fact appear therein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 50; 1970, ch. 56, § 37; 2013, ch. 32, § 53, effective June 25, 2013.

35.260.
Number of votes required.

No person may be convicted of an offense except as provided in KRS 35.225(2) or by the concurrence of two-thirds (2/3) of the members present at the time the vote is taken.

All other questions to be decided by the members of a general or special court-martial shall be determined by a majority vote, but a determination to reconsider a finding of guilty or to reconsider a sentence, with a view toward decreasing it, may be made by any lesser vote which indicates that the reconsideration is not opposed by the number of votes required for that finding or sentence. A tie vote on a challenge disqualifies the member challenged. A tie vote on a motion relating to the question of the accused’s sanity is a determination against the accused. A tie vote on any other question shall be a determination in favor of the accused.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 51; 1970, ch. 56, § 38; 2013, ch. 32, § 54, effective June 25, 2013.

35.265.
Court to announce action.

A court-martial shall announce its findings and sentence to the parties as soon as determined.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 52, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 55, effective June 25, 2013.

35.270.
Record of trial.

Each general and special court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings in each case before it, and the record shall be authenticated by the signature of the military judge. If the record cannot be authenticated by the military judge by reason of his death, disability or absence, it shall be authenticated by the signature of the trial counsel or by that of a member, if the trial counsel is unable to authenticate it by reason of his or her death, disability, or absence. In a court-martial consisting of only a military judge, the record shall be authenticated by the court reporter under the same conditions which would impose such a duty on a member under this subsection.

A complete verbatim record of the proceedings and testimony shall be prepared in each general and special court-martial case resulting in a conviction.

In all other court-martial cases, the record shall contain such matters as may be prescribed by regulations.

A copy of the record of the proceedings of each general and special court-martial shall be given to the accused as soon as it is authenticated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 53; 1970, ch. 56, § 39; 1974, ch. 108, § 7; 2013, ch. 32, § 56, effective June 25, 2013.

35.275.
Cruel and unusual punishments prohibited.

Punishment by flogging, or by branding, marking, or tattooing on the body, or any other cruel or unusual punishment may not be adjudged by a court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this code. The use of irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 54, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 57, effective June 25, 2013.

35.277.
Maximum limits.

The punishment which a court-martial may direct for an offense may not exceed such limits as prescribed by this code, but in no instance may a sentence exceed more than ten (10) years for a military offense, nor shall a sentence of death be adjudged. A conviction by general court-martial of any military offense for which an accused may receive a sentence of confinement for more than one (1) year is a felony offense. All other military offenses are misdemeanors.

The limits of punishment for violations of the punitive articles prescribed in this code shall be lesser of the sentences prescribed by the manual for courts-martial of the United States in effect on January 1, 2004, and the state manual for courts-martial, but in no instance shall any punishment exceed that authorized by this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 58, effective June 25, 2013.

35.280.
Effective date of sentences.

Whenever a sentence of a court-martial, as lawfully adjudged and approved, includes a forfeiture of pay or allowances in addition to confinement not suspended, the forfeiture may apply to pay or allowances becoming due on or after the date the sentence is approved by the convening authority. No forfeiture may extend to any pay or allowances accrued before that date.

Any period of confinement included in a sentence of a court-martial begins to run from the date the sentence is adjudged by the court-martial, but periods during which the sentence to confinement is suspended or deferred shall be excluded in computing the service of the term of confinement.

All other sentences of courts-martial are effective on the date ordered executed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 55; 1970, ch. 56, § 40; 2013, ch. 32, § 59, effective June 25, 2013.